Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
CHAPTER 198A Low-Cost Housing

198A.010.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, the following words and terms, unless the context clearly indicates a different meaning, shall have the following respective meanings:

“Area median income” means the greater of the statewide median family income or the median family income for the area in which the residence is located, as calculated each year by the federal Department of Housing and Urban Development for use in determining eligibility for housing programs;

“Bonds” or “notes” means the bonds or bond anticipation notes authorized to be issued by the corporation under this chapter but shall not include any fund notes;

“Commonwealth” means the Commonwealth of Kentucky;

“Corporation” means the Kentucky Housing Corporation created by this chapter;

“Sponsors” means persons, corporations, associations, partnerships, or other entities, consumer housing cooperatives and limited dividend housing corporations, associations, partnerships, or other entities organized pursuant to the Kentucky Revised Statutes for the primary purpose of providing housing to persons and families of lower and moderate income, and shall include without limitation organizations engaged in the production, origination, and development of residential housing units intended to qualify for financial assistance pursuant to Section 8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937, as amended;

“Development costs” means the costs approved by the corporation as appropriate expenditures and credits which may be incurred by sponsors of residential housing, prior to commitment and initial advance of the proceeds of a construction loan or of a mortgage loan, including but not limited to:

Payments for options to purchase properties on the proposed residential housing site, deposits on contracts of purchase, or, with prior approval of the corporation, payments for the purchase of properties;

Legal and organizational expenses, including payments of attorney’s fees, project manager, clerical, and other staff salaries, office rent, and other incidental expenses;

Payment of fees for preliminary feasibility studies and advances for planning, engineering, and architectural work;

Expenses for tenant surveys and market analyses;

Necessary application and other fees; and

Credits allowed by the corporation to recognize the value of service provided at no cost by the sponsors, builders, and/or developers;

“Fund notes” means the notes authorized to be issued by the corporation under the provisions of KRS 198A.080;

“Governmental agency” means any city, county, or other political subdivision of the Commonwealth, the Commonwealth and any department, division, or public agency thereof, the federal government or any political subdivision of any other state, any public housing authority or any nonprofit corporation or other entity legally empowered to act on behalf of any of the foregoing to perform the duties of a public housing authority, or any two (2) or more thereof;

“Housing development fund” means the housing development fund created by KRS 198A.080;

“Insured construction loan” means a construction loan for land development or residential housing which is secured by a mortgage either insured or guaranteed by or for which there is a commitment to insure or guarantee by:

The United States of America or any agency or instrumentality thereof; or

Any other entity which has been duly approved for the insuring of such loans by the United States of America or by the Commonwealth of Kentucky or any agency or instrumentality thereof;

“Insured mortgage” or “insured mortgage loan” means a mortgage loan for land development for residential housing or for residential housing either made, insured, or guaranteed by or for which there is a commitment to make, insure, and guarantee by:

The United States of America or any agency or instrumentality thereof; or

Any other entity, including private mortgage insurance, which has been duly approved for the insuring of such loans by the United States of America or by the Commonwealth or any agency or instrumentality thereof and shall also refer to and mean any loan for residential housing not secured by mortgage which is insured or guaranteed to at least eighty-five percent (85%) of its principal amount by the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality thereof;

“Land development” means the process of acquiring land primarily for residential housing construction for persons and families of lower and moderate income and making, installing, or constructing nonresidential housing improvements, including water, sewer, and other utilities, roads, streets, curbs, gutters, sidewalks, storm drainage facilities, and other installations or works, whether on or off the site, which the corporation deems necessary or desirable to prepare the land primarily for residential housing construction;

“Obligations” means any bonds, bond anticipation notes, or fund notes authorized to be issued by the corporation under the provisions of this chapter;

“Persons and families of lower and moderate income” shall include only those individuals whose family income combined does not exceed the income requirements defined under Section 143 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;

“Residential housing” means a specific work or improvement undertaken primarily to provide dwelling accommodations for persons and families of lower and moderate income, including the acquisition, construction, or rehabilitation of land, buildings, and improvements, and other nonhousing facilities as may be incidental; and

“Tenant programs and services” means services and activities for persons and families living in residential housing, including the following:

Counseling on household management, housekeeping, budgeting, and money management;

Child care and similar matters;

Access to available community services related to job training and placement, education, health, welfare, and other community services;

Guard and other matters related to the physical security of the housing residents;

Effective management-tenant relations, including tenant participation in all aspects of housing administration, management, and maintenance;

Physical improvements of the housing, including buildings, recreational and community facilities, safety measures, and removal of code violations;

Advisory services for tenants in the creation of tenant organizations which will assume a meaningful and responsible role in the planning and carrying out of housing affairs; and

Procedures whereby tenants, either individually or in a group, may be given a hearing on questions relating to management policies and practices, either in general or in relation to an individual or family.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 70, § 3; 1974, ch. 383, § 1; 1976, ch. 364, § 1; 1978, ch. 220, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 99, § 1, effective March 23, 1982; 1982, ch. 182, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 87, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 215, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 2002, ch. 61, § 1, effective March 15, 2002; 2011, ch. 23, § 1, effective March 15, 2011.

198A.015.
Kentucky Housing Corporation’s status as a de jure political subdivision.

The General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky hereby finds and determines that in order to comply with technical income tax rules and regulations proposed to be adopted by the Department of the Treasury, Internal Revenue Service, with regard to the issuance of securities by states and political subdivisions thereof, it is appropriate and proper that the Kentucky Housing Corporation’s status as a de jure political subdivision of the Commonwealth of Kentucky be confirmed by adoption of appropriate clarifying amendments to the Kentucky Revised Statutes.

History.
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 200, § 1, effective March 29, 1976.

198A.020.
Policy and purpose.

The General Assembly hereby finds and declares that as a result of the spread of slum conditions and blight to formerly sound urban and rural neighborhoods and as a result of actions involving highways, public facilities and urban renewal activities there exists in the Commonwealth a serious shortage of decent, safe and sanitary residential housing available at prices or rentals which can be afforded by persons and families of lower and moderate income. This shortage is severe in certain urban areas of the state, is especially critical in the rural areas, and is inimical to the health, safety, welfare and prosperity of all residents of the Commonwealth and to the sound growth of Kentucky communities.

The General Assembly hereby finds and declares further that private enterprise and investment have not been able to produce, without assistance, the needed construction of decent, safe and sanitary residential housing at low prices or rentals which persons and families of lower and moderate income can afford, or to achieve the urgently needed rehabilitation of much of the present supply of residential housing available for persons and families of lower and moderate income. It is imperative that the supply of residential housing for persons and families of lower and moderate income affected by the spread of slum conditions and blight and for persons and families of lower and moderate income displaced by public actions or natural disaster be increased; and that private enterprise and investment be encouraged to sponsor, build and rehabilitate residential housing for such persons and families, to help prevent the recurrence of slum conditions and blight and assist in their permanent elimination throughout the Commonwealth.

The General Assembly hereby finds and declares further that the purposes of this chapter are to provide financing for development costs, land development and residential housing construction, new or rehabilitated, for sale or rental to persons and families of lower and moderate income.

The General Assembly hereby finds and declares further that in accomplishing this purpose, the Kentucky Housing Corporation shall be and constitute a de jure municipal corporation and political subdivision of the Commonwealth of Kentucky created for the performance of essential public functions and the serving of public purposes in improving and promoting the health, welfare and prosperity of the people of the Commonwealth of Kentucky by the production of residential housing.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 70, § 2; 1976, ch. 200, § 2; 1978, ch. 220, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 99, § 2, effective March 23, 1982.

198A.025.
State policy on housing.

The General Assembly hereby finds and declares it to be in the public interest to establish a state policy on housing. The objectives of a Kentucky housing policy shall be to:

Encourage the availability of decent and affordable housing for all Kentucky residents;

Identify the basic housing needs of all Kentuckians, including the elderly, persons of low and very low income, the disabled, the homeless, and single-parent households;

Coordinate housing activities and services among state departments and agencies to ensure program flexibility and comprehensive housing production;

Remove administrative and regulatory guidelines to ensure compatibility in the development of affordable housing for all Kentuckians;

Inventory state owned lands and buildings to evaluate utilization for both public and private housing development;

Encourage and strengthen collaborative planning and partnerships among social service providers, all levels of government, and the public and private sectors, including for-profit and nonprofit organizations, in the production of affordable housing;

Reevaluate housing and housing-related programs and policies to ensure proper coordination of those programs and policies;

Coordinate housing into comprehensive community and economic development strategies at the state and local levels;

Encourage local planning commissions to include a housing element in the five (5) year comprehensive plan; and

Discourage housing policies or strategies which concentrate affordable housing in limited sections of metropolitan areas and county jurisdiction.

History.
Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 50, § 1, effective July 15, 1996.

198A.030.
Kentucky Housing Corporation established — Board of directors — Officers of corporation and duties.

There is hereby created and established an independent, de jure municipal corporation and political subdivision of the Commonwealth which shall be a public body corporate and politic to be known as the Kentucky Housing Corporation.

The Kentucky Housing Corporation is created and established as a de jure municipal corporation and political subdivision of the Commonwealth to perform essential governmental and public functions and purposes in improving and otherwise promoting the health and general welfare of the people by the production of residential housing in Kentucky.

The corporation shall be governed by a board of directors, consisting of fifteen (15) members, five (5) of whom shall be the Lieutenant Governor, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the commissioner of the Department for Local Government, the Attorney General, and the secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development, or their duly appointed designees, as public directors, and ten (10) private directors who shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate as provided by KRS 11.160, as follows:

One (1) private director representing the interests of financial lending institutions located within the Commonwealth;

One (1) private director representing the interests of the manufactured housing industry within the Commonwealth;

One (1) private director representing the interests of real estate practitioners licensed by the Kentucky Real Estate Commission;

One (1) private director representing the interests of the homeless population within the Commonwealth;

One (1) private director representing the interests of local government;

One (1) private director representing the interests of the home construction industry in the Commonwealth;

One (1) private director representing the interests of consumers in the Commonwealth;

One (1) private director representing the interests of the Kentucky State Building Trades Council;

One (1) director representing the interests of nonprofit housing organizations located within the Commonwealth; and

One (1) director having significant professional experience in auditing, financial accounting, municipal bond financing, or investment banking.

Private directors appointed by the Governor may include previous members of the board, and members may be reappointed for successive terms. All appointments shall be for four (4) years, and the appointees shall serve until a qualified successor is appointed.

In case of a vacancy, the Governor may appoint a person for the vacancy to hold office during the remainder of the term. A vacancy shall be filled in accordance with the requirement and procedures for appointments.

The Governor may remove any private director whom he may appoint in case of incompetency, neglect of duty, gross immorality, or malfeasance in office, and he may declare his office vacant and may appoint a person for the vacancy as provided in this section.

The Governor shall designate a director of the corporation to serve as chairman. The term of the chairman shall extend to the earlier of either the date of expiration of his then current term as a director of the corporation or a date six (6) months after the expiration of the then current term of the Governor designating the chairman.

The board of directors shall annually elect one (1) of its members as vice chairman. The board of directors shall also elect or appoint, and prescribe the duties of, other officers the board of directors deems necessary or advisable, including an executive director and a secretary, and the board of directors shall fix the compensation of the officers.

The executive director shall administer, manage, and direct the affairs and business of the corporation, subject to the policies, control, and direction of the board of directors of the corporation. The secretary of the corporation shall keep a record of the proceedings of the corporation and shall be custodian of all books, documents, and papers filed with the corporation, the minute book or journal of the corporation, and its official seal. The secretary shall have authority to cause copies to be made of all minutes and other records and documents of the corporation and to give certificates under the official seal of the corporation to the effect that copies are true copies, and all persons dealing with the corporation may rely upon the certificates.

A majority of the board of directors of the corporation shall constitute a quorum for the purposes of conducting its business and exercising its powers and for all other purposes. A majority shall be determined by excluding any existing vacancies from the total number of directors.

Action shall be taken by the corporation upon a vote of a majority of the directors present at a meeting at which a quorum shall exist called upon three (3) days’ written notice to each director or upon the concurrence of at least eight (8) directors.

Each private director shall be entitled to a fee of one hundred dollars ($100) for attendance at each meeting of the board of directors or duly called committee meeting of the board.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 70, § 4; 1974, ch. 257, § 7; 1974, ch. 383, § 2; 1976, ch. 200, § 13; 1976, ch. 210, § 6; 1978, ch. 154, § 16, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 155, § 121, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 220, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 571, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 141, § 6, effective July 15, 1980; 1980, ch. 295, § 46, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 182, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 396, § 49, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 339, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 289, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 69, § 69, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 85, § 620, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 47, § 86, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 12, § 46, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 117, § 82, effective July 15, 2010.

198A.035.
Advisory committee on housing policy.

The Kentucky Housing Corporation shall oversee the development and implementation of the Kentucky housing policy. The corporation shall create an advisory committee on housing policy consisting of the following:

The following nine (9) state government members, or their duly appointed designees: the commissioner of education; commissioner of the Department for Local Government; commissioner of the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction; secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet; secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services; executive director of the Human Rights Commission; state historic preservation officer; secretary of the Transportation Cabinet; and executive director of the Kentucky Housing Corporation;

At-large members shall be appointed by the chairman of the board of directors of the Kentucky Housing Corporation. There shall be one (1) at-large representative for each of the following:

Public housing authorities;

Mortgage banking industry;

Manufactured housing industry;

Realtors;

Homebuilders;

Urban nonprofit housing organizations;

Rural nonprofit housing organizations;

Urban advocates for the homeless;

Rural advocates for the homeless;

Residents of economically diverse urban neighborhoods;

Residents of economically diverse rural neighborhoods;

Rental property providers;

Advocates for persons with physical disabilities;

Advocates for persons with mental disabilities;

The Kentucky State Building Trades Council;

The Kentucky League of Cities; and

The Kentucky Association of Counties; and

One (1) member of the Senate and one (1) member of the House of Representatives.

State government members and General Assembly members shall serve on the advisory committee during the term of their elected or appointed state government positions. Members appointed as provided by subsection (1)(b) of this section shall be appointed for four (4) year terms, except that initially five (5) shall be appointed for two (2) year terms, six (6) shall be appointed for three (3) year terms, and six (6) shall be appointed for four (4) year terms.

The advisory committee shall meet at least quarterly and hold additional meetings as necessary. Eleven (11) members of the committee shall constitute a quorum for the purposes of conducting business and exercising its powers for all purposes.

Any vacancy shall be filled as provided by the requirements and procedures for the initial appointment and only for the remainder of the term of the initial appointment.

Any at-large member may be removed at any time, with or without cause, by resolution of a majority of the board of directors of the corporation.

The advisory committee shall consult with and advise the officers and directors of the corporation concerning matters relating to the Kentucky housing policy.

The corporation shall annually report its findings and recommendations regarding the Kentucky housing policy to the Governor and the Interim Joint Committee on Local Government of the Legislative Research Commission.

The advisory committee shall elect a presiding officer from among its members and may establish its own rules of procedure which shall not be inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

Members of the advisory committee shall serve without compensation. Members who are not employees of the Commonwealth shall be entitled to reimbursement for actual expenses incurred in carrying out their duties on the committee.

The Kentucky Housing Corporation shall provide the staff and funding for the administrative activities of the advisory committee. The Kentucky Housing Corporation shall perform all budgeting, procurement, and other administrative activities necessary to the functioning of the advisory committee. The advisory committee may authorize studies as it deems necessary and utilize Kentucky Housing Corporation funds and other available resources from the public or private sector to provide housing needs data.

History.
Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 50, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 69, § 70, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 426, § 132, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 7, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 105, § 19, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 99, § 43, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 47, § 87, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 243, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 117, § 83, effective July 15, 2010.

198A.040.
Corporate powers.

The corporation shall have all of the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this chapter, including but without limiting the generality of the foregoing the power:

To make or participate in the making of insured construction loans to sponsors of land development or residential housing; provided, however, that such loans shall be made only upon the determination by the corporation that construction loans have been refused in writing, wholly or in part, from private lenders in the Commonwealth of Kentucky upon reasonably equivalent terms and conditions;

To make or participate in the making of insured mortgage loans to sponsors of residential housing; provided, however, that such loans shall be made only upon the determination by the corporation that mortgage loans have been refused in writing, wholly or in part, from private lenders in the Commonwealth of Kentucky upon reasonably equivalent terms and conditions;

To purchase or participate in the purchase of insured mortgage loans made to sponsors of residential housing or to persons of lower and moderate income for residential housing; provided, however, that any such purchase shall be made only upon the determination by the corporation that mortgage loans have been refused in writing, wholly or in part, from private lenders in the Commonwealth of Kentucky upon reasonably equivalent terms and conditions;

To make temporary loans from the housing development fund;

To collect and pay reasonable fees and charges in connection with making, purchasing and servicing its loans, notes, bonds, commitments, and other evidences of indebtedness;

To acquire real property, or any interest therein, by purchase, foreclosure, lease, sublease, or otherwise; to own, manage, operate, hold, clear, improve, and rehabilitate such real property; and to sell, assign, exchange, transfer, convey, lease, mortgage, or otherwise dispose of or encumber such real property where such use of real property is necessary or appropriate to the purpose of the Kentucky Housing Corporation;

To sell, at public or private sale, all or any part of any mortgage or other instrument or document securing a construction, land development, mortgage, or temporary loan of any type permitted by this chapter;

To procure insurance against any loss in connection with its operations in such amounts, and from such insurers, as it may deem necessary or desirable;

To consent, whenever it deems it necessary or desirable in the fulfillment of its corporate purposes, to the modification of the rate of interest, time of payment of any installment of principal or interest, or any other terms of any mortgage loan, mortgage loan commitment, construction loan, temporary loan, contract, or agreement of any kind to which the corporation is a party;

To acquire, establish, operate, lease, and sublease residential housing for persons and families of lower and moderate income and to enter into agreements or other transactions with any federal, state, or local governmental agency for the purpose of providing adequate living quarters for such persons and families in cities and counties where a need has been found for such housing and where no local housing authorities or other organizations exist to fill such need;

To include in any borrowing such amounts as may be deemed necessary by the corporation to pay financing charges, interest on the obligations for a period not exceeding two (2) years from their date, consultant, advisory, and legal fees and such other expenses as are necessary or incident to such borrowing;

To make and publish rules and regulations respecting its lending programs and such other rules and regulations as are necessary to effectuate its corporate purposes;

To provide technical and advisory services to sponsors of residential housing and to residents and potential residents thereof, including but not limited to housing selection and purchase procedures, family budgeting, property use and maintenance, household management, and utilization of community resources;

To promote research and development in scientific methods of constructing low cost residential housing of high durability;

To encourage community organizations to participate in residential housing development;

To make, execute, and effectuate any and all agreements or other documents with any governmental agency or any person, corporation, association, partnership, or other organization or entity, necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter;

To accept gifts, devises, bequests, grants, loans, appropriations, revenue sharing, other financing and assistance, and any other aid from any source whatsoever and to agree to, and to comply with, conditions attached thereto;

To sue and be sued in its own name and plead and be impleaded;

To maintain an office in the city of Frankfort and at such other place or places as it may determine;

To adopt an official seal and alter the same at pleasure;

To adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business and to prescribe rules, regulations, and policies in connection with the performance of its functions and duties;

To employ fiscal consultants, engineers, attorneys, real estate counselors, appraisers, and such other consultants and employees as may be required in the judgment of the corporation and to fix and pay their compensation from funds available to the corporation therefor, provided that any personal service contracts entered into shall be subject to review by the Government Contract Review Committee of the Legislative Research Commission;

To invest any funds held in reserve or in sinking fund accounts or any moneys not required for immediate disbursement in obligations guaranteed by the Commonwealth, the United States, or their agencies or instrumentalities; provided, however, that the return on such investments shall not violate any rulings of the Internal Revenue Service regarding the investment of the proceeds of any federally tax exempt bond issue;

To make or participate in the making of rehabilitation loans to the sponsors or owners of residential housing; provided, however, that any such rehabilitation loan shall be made only upon the determination by the corporation that the rehabilitation loan was not otherwise available wholly or in part from private lenders upon reasonably equivalent terms and conditions;

To insure or reinsure construction, mortgage, and rehabilitation loans on residential housing; provided, however, that any such insurance, reinsurance, or waiver shall be made only upon the determination by the corporation:

That such insurance or reinsurance is not otherwise available wholly or in part from private insurers upon reasonably equivalent terms and conditions; and

That such loan is a reasonably sound business investment; and provided further that insurance may be waived only where the corporation finds that the amount of the loan does not exceed eighty-five percent (85%) of the development costs, or eighty-five percent (85%) of the value of the property secured by the mortgage as determined by at least two (2) appraisers who are independent of the sponsors, builders, and developers;

To make grants from appropriated funds, agency and trust funds, and any other funds from any source available to the corporation, to sponsors, municipalities, local housing authorities, and to owners of residential housing for the development, construction, rehabilitation, or maintenance of residential housing and such facilities related thereto as corporation shall deem important for a proper living environment, all on such terms and conditions as may be deemed appropriate by the corporation;

To make periodic grants to reduce principal and interest payments on mortgages or rentals payable by persons and families of lower and moderate income;

To make a grant to reduce principal and interest payments on a mortgage or a rental payable by a regular member of the United States Armed Forces who names Kentucky as home of record for military purposes, during that member’s deployment on active duty outside the United States, or payable by a member of a state National Guard or a Reserve component who names Kentucky as home of record for military purposes, during that member’s federal active duty. To qualify for a grant, a member shall meet reasonable standards established by the corporation, including having family income equal to or less than two hundred percent (200%) of the state or area median income; and
(28) (a)

To make a grant to reduce principal and interest payments on a mortgage or a rental payable by a regular member of the United States Armed Forces who names Kentucky as home of record for military purposes, during that member’s deployment on active duty outside the United States, or payable by a member of a state National Guard or a Reserve component who names Kentucky as home of record for military purposes, during that member’s federal active duty. To qualify for a grant, a member shall meet reasonable standards established by the corporation, including having family income equal to or less than two hundred percent (200%) of the state or area median income; and

To provide a member identified in paragraph (a) of this subsection and that member’s Kentucky resident spouse with the educational, technical, and ombudsman services that are necessary to maintain a mortgage during that member’s federal active duty;

To establish a program to assist persons and families of lower and moderate income to help defray the cost of assessment and decontamination services required under KRS 224.1-410. To qualify for the program, a person shall meet reasonable standards established by the corporation. A person shall not be eligible for the program if convicted of a felony or found by the corporation to be responsible for contamination of the relevant property through methamphetamine production. The corporation shall report on the establishment and use of this program to the Legislative Research Commission by October 1 of each year;

To establish single-family mortgage-lending programs outside of the mortgage revenue bond funds. To qualify for these programs, a person shall meet reasonable standards established by the corporation and shall have a combined family income that is equal to or less than one hundred seventy-five percent (175%) of the greater of the state or area median income; and

To perform the following activities for lenders, holders, housing finance agencies, or other third-party entities, who are located within or without the boundaries of the Commonwealth:

Service mortgage loans;

Administer federal or state program contracts; and

Perform other housing activities to facilitate the delivery or preservation of affordable housing.

The Kentucky Housing Corporation shall be exempt from the regulations of the Department of Insurance and the laws of the Commonwealth relating thereto.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 70, § 5; 1974, ch. 383, § 3; 1976, ch. 364, § 2; 1978, ch. 220, § 4, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 99, § 3, effective March 23, 1982; 1982, ch. 182, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 486, § 8, effective July 15, 1998; 2006, ch. 252, Part XXVIII, § 7, effective April 25, 2006; 2007, ch. 55, § 1, effective June 26, 2007; 2007, ch. 83, § 2, effective June 26, 2007; 2008, ch. 161, § 3, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 24, § 244, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 23, § 2, effective March 15, 2011; 2014, ch. 28, § 1, effective July 15, 2014.

198A.050.
Administration of programs by executive director — Requirements.

In the administration of the programs authorized by or receiving benefits under KRS 198A.040, the executive director of the Kentucky Housing Corporation shall require:

That to the greatest extent feasible opportunities for training and employment arising in connection with the planning, construction, rehabilitation, and operation of housing assisted under such programs shall be given to persons of lower and moderate income residing in the area of such housing; and

That to the greatest extent feasible contracts for work to be performed pursuant to such programs shall be awarded to business concerns, including but not limited to individuals or firms doing business in the fields of design, architecture, building construction, rehabilitation, maintenance or repair, located in or owned in substantial part by persons residing in the area of such housing.

In the administration of rental residential housing assisted under this chapter, the executive director of the Kentucky Housing Corporation shall require maximum feasible tenant participation and responsibility in tenant programs and services.

The executive director of the Kentucky Housing Corporation shall establish standards of performance for materials, methods and design which meet the minimum requirements of appropriate federal or state agencies.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 70, § 6; 1974, ch. 383, § 4; 1982, ch. 99, § 4, effective March 23, 1982.

198A.060.
Requirements for loan agreement or articles of incorporation of assisted entities — Limit on return of investment of stockholders or members.

The loan agreement or the articles of incorporation, association, partnership or other governing documents of any sponsor, builder or developer assisted under this chapter shall contain, in addition to other requirements of law:

That the corporation, cooperative or association has been organized to provide housing facilities and such social, recreational, commercial and community facilities as may be incidental or appurtenant thereto for persons or families of lower and moderate income;

That the operations of the corporation, cooperative or association may be supervised by the Kentucky Housing Corporation and that the corporation, cooperative or association shall enter into such agreements with the Kentucky Housing Corporation as the Kentucky Housing Corporation from time to time requires, providing for regulation by the Kentucky Housing Corporation of the planning, development and management of any residential housing undertaken by the corporation, cooperative or association and their disposition of the property and franchises;

That the Kentucky Housing Corporation shall have the power to appoint to the board of directors of the corporation, cooperative or association a number of new directors, which number shall be sufficient to constitute a majority of the board, if the corporation, cooperative or association has received a loan or advance under this chapter and the Kentucky Housing Corporation determines that the loan or advance is in jeopardy of not being repaid, or that the residential housing for which the loan or advance was made is in jeopardy of not being constructed.

The articles of incorporation, association, partnership or other governing documents of any limited dividend corporation, association or entity of any sponsor, builder or developer assisted under this chapter shall provide, in addition to other requirements of law, that every stockholder or member shall be deemed to have agreed that he shall not receive from the corporation, association or entity in repayment of his investment any sums in excess of the face value of the investment attributable to his respective interest plus cumulative dividend payments at such rate as the Kentucky Housing Corporation deems to be reasonable and proper.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 70, § 7; 1976, ch. 364, § 3; 1982, ch. 99, § 5, effective March 23, 1982; 1982, ch. 182, § 4, effective July 15, 1982.